Maryland, session 2026, HB0560.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – General
[11–239.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0560*

HOUSE BILL 560
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Data center” means a building or group of buildings used to house
computer systems, computer storage equipment, and associated infrastructure that
businesses or other organizations use to organize, process, store, and disseminate large
amounts of data.
(3) “Department” means the Department of Commerce.
(4) “Opportunity zone” means an area that has been designated as a
qualified opportunity zone in the State under § 1400Z–1 of the Internal Revenue Code.
(5) (i) “Qualified data center” means a data center located in the State
in which an individual or a corporation, within 3 years after submitting an application for
the sales and use tax exemption under this section, has:
1. for a data center located within a Tier I area, invested at
least $2,000,000 in qualified data center personal property and created at least five
qualified positions; or
2. for a data center located in any other area of the State,
invested at least $5,000,000 in qualified data center personal property and created at least
five qualified positions.
(ii) “Qualified data center” includes:
1. a data center that is a co–located or hosting data center
where equipment, space, and bandwidth are available to lease to multiple customers; and
2. an enterprise data center owned and operated by the
company it supports.
(6) (i) “Qualified data center personal property” means personal
property purchased or leased to establish or operate a data center.
(ii) “Qualified data center personal property” includes:
1. computer equipment or enabling software used for the
processing, storage, retrieval, or communication of data, including servers, routers,
connections, and other enabling hardware used in the operation of that equipment;
2. heating, ventilation, and air–conditioning and mechanical
systems, including chillers, cooling towers, air–handling units, pumps, energy storage or
energy efficiency technology, and other capital equipment used in the operation of that
equipment; and

HOUSE BILL 560 3
3. equipment necessary for the generation, transformation,
transmission, distribution, or management of electricity, including exterior substations,
generators, transformers, unit substations, uninterruptible power supply systems,
batteries, power distribution units, remote power panels, and any other capital equipment
necessary for these purposes.
(7) (i) “Qualified position” means a position that:
1. is a full–time position of indefinite duration;
2. pays at least 150% of the State minimum wage;
3. is newly created because a data center begins or expands
in a single location in the State; and
4. is filled.
(ii) “Qualified position” does not include a position:
1. created if an employment function is shifted from an
existing data center in the State to another data center of related ownership if the position
is not a net new job in the State;
2. created through a change in ownership of a trade or
business;
3. created through a consolidation, merger, or restructuring
of a business entity if the position is not a net new job in the State;
4. created if an employment function is contractually shifted
from an existing business entity in the State to another business entity if the position is
not a net new job in the State; or
5. filled for a period of less than 12 months.
(8) “Tier I area” means:
(i) a Tier I county as defined in § 1–101 of the Economic
Development Article; or
(ii) an opportunity zone.
(b) The sales and use tax does not apply to the sale of qualified data center
personal property for use at a qualified data center if the buyer provides the vendor with
evidence of eligibility for the exemption issued by the Comptroller.

HOUSE BILL 560
(c) (1) To qualify for the sales and use tax exemption under subsection (b) of
this section, an individual or a corporation shall file an application for an exemption
certificate with the Department.
(2) The application must:
(i) demonstrate that the applicant intends to meet the requirements
of a qualified data center; and
(ii) include any information the Department requires to evidence the
capacity and intention of the applicant to fulfill the commitments set forth in the applicant’s
application.
(3) If, based on the information and supporting documentation provided in
the application, the Department determines the applicant is eligible for the sales and use
tax exemption under subsection (b) of this section, the Department shall certify the
eligibility of the applicant.
(d) (1) Each year, the Department shall provide the Comptroller with a list of
individuals and corporations that the Department determines are eligible for the sales and
use tax exemption under subsection (b) of this section.
(2) Within 30 days after receiving the list described in paragraph (1) of this
subsection, the Comptroller shall issue to each individual and corporation listed a
certificate of eligibility for the sales and use tax exemption under subsection (b) of this
section.
(3) (i) The certificate of eligibility issued under paragraph (2) of this
subsection:
1. must be renewed each year; and
2. except as provided in subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, may
not be renewed for more than 10 consecutive years.
(ii) If the individual or corporation invests at least $250,000,000 in
qualified data center personal property, the certificate of eligibility may be renewed for up
to 20 consecutive years.
(e) For at least 3 years after the termination of a certificate issued under
subsection (d) of this section, each individual or corporation that receives the certificate
shall:
(1) maintain a record of:
(i) the amount of sales and use tax that was not paid as a result of
the certificate;

HOUSE BILL 560 5
(ii) the number of qualified positions created; and
(iii) the investment in qualified data center personal property; and
(2) allow the Department to inspect the records described in item (1) of this
subsection.
(f) (1) The Department may revoke a certificate of eligibility under subsection
(d) of this section if any representation made in connection with the application for the
certificate is determined by the Department to have been false when made or if the
applicant has failed to fulfill the applicant’s commitments under the application.
(2) The revocation may be in full or in part as the Department may
determine.
(3) The individual or corporation shall have an opportunity to appeal any
revocation to the Department before notification of the Comptroller.
(4) The Comptroller may make an assessment against the individual or
corporation to recapture any amount of sales and use tax that the individual or corporation
has not paid as a result of an exemption under subsection (b) of this section.]
Article – Tax – Property
[7–248.
(a) In this section, “qualified data center” and “qualified data center personal
property” have the meanings stated in § 11–238 of the Tax – General Article.
(b) The governing body of a county or municipal corporation may reduce or
eliminate, by law, the percentage of the assessment of any qualified data center personal
property used in a qualified data center that is subject to the county or municipal
corporation property tax under this title.
(c) (1) A county or municipal corporation that reduces or eliminates the
percentage of assessment of taxable qualified data center personal property under
subsection (b) of this section shall submit a copy of the law to the Department.
(2) If the Department receives a copy of the law on or before May 1, the
change will be effective for the taxable year following the date the law is enacted.
(d) If any qualified data center personal property is exempt under subsection (c)
of this section from county property tax but is subject to municipal corporation property
tax, the Department or the supervisor shall provide the municipal corporation with the
assessment of the qualified data center personal property.

HOUSE BILL 560
(e) The Department may adopt regulations to implement this section.]
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.